Vermont, session 2025-2026, S178.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 6506 is added to read:
§ 6506. SPEEDY TRIAL STANDARDS
(a)(1) A defendant charged with a nonviolent misdemeanor may move for
dismissal if the trial has not commenced within one year after the charge was
filed.
(2) A defendant charged with a nonviolent felony may move for
dismissal if the trial has not commenced within two years after the charge was
filed.
VT LEG #385920 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.178
2026 Page 2 of 5
(b)(1) The prosecutor shall respond to a motion filed pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section within 14 days, and the court may set the matter for hearing.
The response shall explain why the trial did not commence within the time
period required by subsection (a) of this section, and may refer to any of the
following factors:
(A) the seriousness and circumstances of the charged offense;
(B) the extent of harm resulting from the offense;
(C) the evidence of guilt and its admissibility at trial;
(D) the likelihood of new or additional evidence at trial or retrial;
(E) the defendant’s history, character, and condition;
(F) the length of any pretrial incarceration or any incarceration for
related or similar offenses;
(G) the purpose and effect of imposing a sentence authorized by the
offense;
(H) the impact of dismissal on public confidence in the judicial
system or on the safety and welfare of the community in the event the
defendant is guilty;
(I) the existence of any misconduct by law enforcement personnel in
the investigation, arrest, or prosecution of the defendant;
(J) the existence of any prejudice to defendant as the result of the
passage of time;
VT LEG #385920 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.178
2026 Page 3 of 5
(K) the attitude of the complainant or victim with respect to dismissal
of the case; and
(L) any other relevant fact indicating that judgment of conviction
would serve no useful purpose.
(2) If the prosecutor does not file a response within 14 days to a motion
filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the court may dismiss the case
with prejudice.
(c) For purposes of this section, the following periods shall be excluded
when computing the time within which the trial of any offense must
commence:
(1) Any period of delay resulting from other proceedings concerning the
defendant, including:
(A) delay resulting from an examination of the defendant and hearing
on the defendant’s mental competency or physical incapacity;
(B) delay resulting from a stay of the proceedings due to an
examination or treatment of the defendant pursuant to chapter 157 of this title;
(C) delay resulting from a trial with respect to other charges against
the defendant, which period shall run from the commencement of the other
trial until 14 days after an acquittal or imposition of sentence;
(D) delay resulting from interlocutory appeals;
(E) delay resulting from hearings on pretrial motions;
VT LEG #385920 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.178
2026 Page 4 of 5
(F) delay resulting from proceedings relating to transfer to or from
another divisions of the superior court; or
(G) delay reasonably attributable to any period, not to exceed 30
days, during which any proceeding concerning the defendant is actually under
advisement.
(2) Any period of delay resulting from the absence or unavailability of
the defendant or an essential witness. A defendant or an essential witness shall
be considered absent when the person’s whereabouts are unknown and the
person is attempting to avoid apprehension or prosecution or when the person’s
whereabouts cannot be determined by due diligence. A defendant or an
essential witness shall be considered unavailable whenever the person’s
whereabouts are known but the person’s presence for trial cannot be obtained
by due diligence or the person resists appearing at or being returned for trial.
(3) Any period of delay resulting from the fact that the defendant is
mentally incompetent or physically unable to stand trial.
(4) If the complaint or indictment is dismissed by the prosecution and
subsequently a charge is filed against the defendant for the same or a related
offense, any period of delay from the date the charge was dismissed to the date
the limitations period would commence to run as to the subsequent charge.
VT LEG #385920 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.178
2026 Page 5 of 5
(5) A reasonable period of delay when the defendant is joined for trial
with a codefendant as to whom the time for trial has not run and there is no
cause for granting a severance.
(6) Any period of delay resulting from the court granting a continuance,
if the court granted the continuance on the basis of findings that the ends of
justice served by taking such action outweighed the best interests of the public
and the defendant in a speedy trial. No period of delay resulting from a
continuance granted by the court in accordance with this paragraph shall be
excludable under this subdivision unless the judge sets forth in the record of
the case, either orally or in writing, the reasons for finding that the ends of
justice served by the granting of the continuance outweigh the best interests of
the public and the defendant in a speedy trial.
(7) Any period of time between the day on which a defendant or the
defendant’s counsel and the prosecuting attorney agree in writing that the
defendant will plead guilty or nolo contendere to the charges and such time as
the judge accepts or rejects the plea arrangement.
(8) Any period of time between the day on which the defendant enters a
plea of guilty and the day on which an order of the court permitting the
withdrawal of the plea becomes final.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385920 v.1